Maryland, session 2026, HB0824.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Law
5–602.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this title, a person may not:
(1) distribute or dispense a controlled dangerous substance; or
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0824*

HOUSE BILL 824
(2) possess a controlled dangerous substance other than cannabis in
sufficient quantity reasonably to indicate under all circumstances an intent to distribute or
dispense a controlled dangerous substance.
Article – Criminal Procedure
10–110.
(a) A person may file a petition listing relevant facts for expungement of a police
record, court record, or other record maintained by the State or a political subdivision of
the State if the person is convicted of:
(2) a felony that is a violation of:
(i) § 7–104 of the Criminal Law Article;
(ii) [the prohibition against possession with intent to distribute a
controlled dangerous substance under § 5–602] § 5–602(A) of the Criminal Law Article; or
(iii) § 6–202(a), § 6–203, or § 6–204 of the Criminal Law Article; or
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.